src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON Johanniter__n_f !!= * @CODE@ 
!-- FIXME gen -->
+N+Msc: PL-ACC/DATn/GEN/NOM ; !cmp-R
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ; !cmp-R


LEXICON Kakt/us__n_m !!= * @CODE@ Kaktus:Kakt
+N+Msc:een PL-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Msc:usse PL-ACC/DATn/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Msc:us SG-ACC/DATse/GENses/GEN/NOM ;

LEXICON Kauf/mann__n_m !!= * @CODE@ Kaufmann:Kauf
+N+Msc:leute PL-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Msc:mann%^Umlaut%>er PL-ACC/DATn/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Msc:mann SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG:mann SG-DATe ;

LEXICON Klima__n_nt !!= * @CODE@ 
+N+Neu:ta  PL-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Neu:te  PL-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Neu:  SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Kod/ex__n_m !!= * @CODE@ Kodex:Kod
!--FIXME-->
+N+Msc:e PL-ACC/DATn/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Msc:izes PL-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Msc:ex SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG:exe SG-DATe ;
+N:ex SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Kont/o__n_nt !!= * @CODE@ Konto:Kont
+N+Neu:en PL-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Neu:i PL-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Neu:os PL-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Neu:o SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N:o SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Kon/us__n_m !!= * @CODE@ Konus:Kon
+N+Msc:en PL-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Msc:usse PL-ACC/DATn/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Msc:us SG-ACC/DAT/GENses/GEN/NOM ;

LEXICON Korp/us__n_nt !!= * @CODE@ Korpus:Korp
+N+Neu:ora PL-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Neu:us SG-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;

LEXICON Kurs/us__n_m !!= * @CODE@ Kursus:Kurs
+N+Msc:e PL-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Msc:us SG-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;

LEXICON Lad/y__n_f !!= * @CODE@ Lady:Lad
+N+Fem:ies PL-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Fem:ys PL-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Fem:y SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;

LEXICON Laudatio__n_f !!= * @CODE@ 
+N+Fem:nen PL-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Fem:nes PL-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Fem: SG-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;

LEXICON Le/u__n_m !!= * @CODE@ Leu:Le
+N+Msc:i PL-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Msc:uen PL-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Msc:u SG-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Msc:u SG-ACCen/DATen/GENen ;

LEXICON Lexik/on__n_nt !!= * @CODE@ Lexikon:Lexik
+N+Neu:a PL-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Neu:on SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;

LEXICON Le/x__n_f !!= * @CODE@ Lex:Le
+N+Fem:ges PL-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Fem:x SG-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;

LEXICON Lim/es__n_f !!= * @CODE@ Limes:Lim
+N+Fem:iten PL-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Fem:ite SG-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;

LEXICON Lir/a__n_f !!= * @CODE@ Lira:Lir
+N+Fem:a PL-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Fem:e PL-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Fem:a SG-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;

LEXICON Logo/s__n_m !!= * @CODE@ Logos:Logo
+N+Msc:i PL-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Msc:s SG-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;

LEXICON Mafios/o__n_m !!= * @CODE@ Mafioso:Mafios
+N+Msc:i PL-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Msc:o SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-GEN ;

LEXICON Mark__n_f !!= * @CODE@ 
!-- FIXME split meanings -->
+N+Fem: PL-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Fem:en PL-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Fem+Use/NG:%^Umlaut%>er PL-ACC/DATn/GEN/NOM ; !scherzhaft
+N+Fem: SG-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;

LEXICON Matri/x__n_f !!= * @CODE@ Matrix:Matri
+N+Fem:ces PL-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Fem:ze PL-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Fem:zes PL-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Fem:x SG-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N:x SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON M/utter__n_f !!= * @CODE@ 
+N+Fem: PL-ACCQ/DATQn/GENQ/NOMQ ;
+N+Fem: SG-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Myth/os__n_m !!= * @CODE@ Mythos:Myth
+N+Msc:en PL-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Msc:os SG-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Msc:us SG-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;

LEXICON Op/us__n_nt !!= * @CODE@ 
+N+Neu:era PL-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Neu:us SG-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;

LEXICON Paradigm/a__n_nt !!= * @CODE@ 
+N+Neu:ta  PL-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Neu:en  PL-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Neu:  SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N:en PL-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Pat/er__n_m !!= * @CODE@ Pater:Pater
+N+Msc:%^Pen%^RmVow%>es PL-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;

LEXICON Pen/ny__n_m !!= * @CODE@ Penny:Pen
+N+Msc:ce  PL-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Msc:nys  PL-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Msc:ny SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N:ny SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Phalan/x__n_f !!= * @CODE@ Phalanx:Phalan
+N+Fem:gen   PL-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Fem:x SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;

LEXICON Piazz/a__n_f !!= * @CODE@ Piazza:Piazz
+N+Fem:e PL-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Fem:a SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;

LEXICON Plas/tik__n_nt !!= * @CODE@ 
+N+Neu: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Präs/es__n_m !!= * @CODE@ Präses:Präs
+N+Msc:iden PL-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Msc:ides PL-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Msc:es SG-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;

LEXICON Requie/m__n_nt !!= * @CODE@ Requiem:Requie
+N+Neu:ms PL-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Neu:n PL-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Neu:m SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;

LEXICON Re/x__n_m !!= * @CODE@ 
+N+Msc:ges PL-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Msc:xe PL-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Msc:x SG-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;

LEXICON Ris/iko__n_nt !!= * @CODE@ Risiko:Ris
+N+Neu:iken PL-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Neu:ikos PL-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Neu:ken PL-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Neu:iko SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Neu:iko SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Rowd/y__n_m !!= * @CODE@ Rowdy:Rowd
+N+Msc:ys PL-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG:ies PL-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Msc:y SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;

LEXICON Sald/o__n_m !!= * @CODE@ 
+N+Msc:en PL-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Msc:i PL-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Msc:os PL-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Msc:o SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;

LEXICON Spektr/um__n_nt !!= * @CODE@ Spektrum:Spektr
+N+Neu:a PL-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Neu:en PL-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Neu:um SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;

LEXICON Stadi/on__n_nt !!= * @CODE@ Stadion:Stadio
+N+Neu:en PL-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Neu:on SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Städteatla/s__n_m !!= * @CODE@ Städteatlas:Städteatla
+N+Msc:nten PL-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Msc:s SG-ACC/DAT/GENses/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Msc:s SG-DATse ;

LEXICON Tr/opf__n_m !!= * @CODE@ 
!-- FIXME -->
+N+Msc:en PL-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Msc:%^Umlaut%>en PL-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACCen/DATen/GENen/NOM ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG:%^Umlaut%>e PL-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON UFO__n_nt !!= * @CODE@ 
+N+Neu:%>S PL-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Neu: SG-ACC/DAT/NOM ;
+N+Neu:%>S SG-GEN ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Vir/us__n_nt !!= * @CODE@ Virus:Vir
+N+Neu:en PL-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Neu:us SG-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;

LEXICON Volum/en__n_nt !!= * @CODE@ Volumen:Volum
+N+Neu:ina PL-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Neu:en SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Kirmes__n_f !!= * @CODE@ 
+N+Fem:sen PL-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Fem: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;



!!
LEXICON SG-CMP-L 
+Cmp/Sg: R ;
LEXICON PL-CMP-L 
+Cmp/Pl: R ;

LEXICON 0n-SG-CMP-L 
:n SG-CMP-L ;
LEXICON 0s-SG-CMP-L 
:s SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON 0en-PL-CMP-L 
:en PL-CMP-L ;
LEXICON 0er-PL-CMP-L 
:er PL-CMP-L ;
LEXICON 0n-PL-CMP-L 
:n PL-CMP-L ;
LEXICON 0nen-PL-CMP-L 
:nen PL-CMP-L ;
LEXICON Qe-PL-CMP-L 
:%^Umlaut%>e PL-CMP-L ;
LEXICON Qer-PL-CMP-L 
:%^Umlaut%>er PL-CMP-L ;

LEXICON PL-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM 
+Pl: NULL ;
LEXICON PL-ACCe/DATe/GENe/NOMe 
+Pl:e NULL ;
LEXICON PL-ACCen/DATen/GENen/NOMen 
+Pl:en NULL ;
LEXICON PL-ACCQ/DATQ/GENQ/NOMQ 
+Pl:%^Umlaut NULL ;
LEXICON PL-ACCQe/DATQe/GENQe/NOMQe 
+Pl:%^Umlaut%>e NULL ;
LEXICON PL-ACCQen/DATQen/GENQen/NOMQen 
+Pl:%^Umlaut%>en NULL ;
LEXICON PL-ACCer/DATer/GENer/NOMer 
+Pl:er NULL ;
LEXICON PL-ACCes/DATes/GENes/NOMes 
+Pl:es NULL ;
LEXICON PL-ACCien/DATien/GENien/NOMien 
+Pl:ien NULL ;
LEXICON PL-ACCn/DATn/GENn/NOMn 
+Pl:n NULL ;
LEXICON PL-ACCnen/DATnen/GENnen/NOMnen 
+Pl:nen NULL ;
LEXICON PL-ACCrn/DATrn/GENrn/NOMrn 
+Pl:rn NULL ;
LEXICON PL-ACCs/DATs/GENs/NOMs 
+Pl:s NULL ;
LEXICON PL-ACCta/DATta/GENta/NOMta 
+Pl:ta NULL ;

LEXICON PL-ACC/DATn/GEN/NOM 
+Pl: s-n-Pl ;
LEXICON PL-ACCe/DATen/GENe/NOMe 
+Pl:e s-n-Pl ;
LEXICON PL-ACCQ/DATQn/GENQ/NOMQ 
+Pl:%^Umlaut s-n-Pl ;
LEXICON PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe 
+Pl:%^Umlaut%>e s-n-Pl ;
LEXICON PL-ACCQer/DATQern/GENQer/NOMQer 
+Pl:%^Umlaut%>er s-n-Pl ;
LEXICON PL-ACCer/DATern/GENer/NOMer 
+Pl:er s-n-Pl ;
LEXICON PL-ACCse/DATsen/GENse/NOMse 
+Pl:se s-n-Pl ;

LEXICON PL-ACC/DATn/DAT/GEN/NOM 
+Pl: s-n-Pl ;
+Pl: DAT ;
LEXICON PL-ACCQe/DATQen/DATQe/GENQe/NOMQe 
+Pl:%^Umlaut%>e s-n-Pl ;
+Pl:%^Umlaut%>e DAT ;

LEXICON PL-ACCQ/GENQ/NOMQ 
+Pl:%^Umlaut ACC ;
+Pl:%^Umlaut GEN ;
+Pl:%^Umlaut NOM ;

LEXICON PL-ACCQe/GENQe/NOMQe 
+Pl:%^Umlaut%>e ACC ;
+Pl:%^Umlaut%>e GEN ;
+Pl:%^Umlaut%>e NOM ;

LEXICON PL-ACCen/GENen/NOMen 
+Pl:en ACC/GEN/NOM ;

LEXICON ACC/GEN/NOM
ACC ;
GEN ;
NOM ;
