src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON Nouns 
Lira:Lir Lir/a__n_f ;
Piazza:Piazz Piazz/a__n_f ;
Mark+Hom1:Mark Mark__n_f "(eng) limit|Mark" ;
Laudatio:Laudatio Laudatio__n_f ;
Koka:Koka Johanniter__n_f ;
Mille:Mille Johanniter__n_f ;
Thai:Thai Johanniter__n_f ;
Johanniter:Johanniter Johanniter__n_f ;
Spezies:Spezies Johanniter__n_f ;
Mutter+Hom1:Mutter M/utter__n_f ;
Königinmutter:Königinmutter M/utter__n_f ;
Limes:Limes Lim/es__n_f ;
Kirmes:Kirmes Kirmes__n_f ;
Lex:Le Le/x__n_f ;
Matrix:Matri Matri/x__n_f ;
Phalanx:Phalan Phalan/x__n_f ;
Sphinx:Sphin Phalan/x__n_f ;
Lobby:Lobb Lad/y__n_f ;
Lady:Lad Lad/y__n_f ;
Story:Stor Lad/y__n_f ;
Party:Part Lad/y__n_f ;
Riesenparty:Riesenpart Lad/y__n_f ;
Kinderparty:Kinderpart Lad/y__n_f ;
Geburtstagsparty:Geburtstagspart Lad/y__n_f ;
Propf:Propf Tr/opf__n_m ;
Tropf:Tropf Tr/opf__n_m ;
Kaufmann:Kauf Kauf/mann__n_m ;
Reisebürokaufmann:Reisebürokauf Kauf/mann__n_m ;
Saldo:Saldo Sald/o__n_m ;
Mafioso:Mafioso Mafios/o__n_m ;
Salto:Salto Mafios/o__n_m ;
Pater:Pater Pat/er__n_m ;
Städteatlas:Städteatla Städteatla/s__n_m ;
Logos:Logo Logo/s__n_m ;
Präses:Präses Präs/es__n_m ;
Mythos:Myth Myth/os__n_m ;
Konus:Konus Kon/us__n_m ;
Kursus:Kurs Kurs/us__n_m ;
Kaktus:Kakt Kakt/us__n_m ;
Leu:Leu Le/u__n_m ;
Rex:Rex Re/x__n_m ;
Kodex:Kod Kod/ex__n_m ;
Teddy:Teddy Rowd/y__n_m ;
Rowdy:Rowdy Rowd/y__n_m ;
Fußballrowdy:Fußballrowdy Rowd/y__n_m ;
Buggy:Buggy Rowd/y__n_m ;
Penny:Penny Pen/ny__n_m ;
UFO:UFO UFO__n_nt ;
Paradigma:Paradigma Paradigm/a__n_nt ;
Stigma:Stigma Paradigm/a__n_nt ;
Xeroderma:Xeroderma Paradigm/a__n_nt ;
Sperma:Sperma Paradigm/a__n_nt ;
Trauma:Trauma Paradigm/a__n_nt ;
Klima:Klima Klima__n_nt ;
Plastik+Hom2:Plastik Plas/tik__n_nt ;
Requiem:Requie Requie/m__n_nt ;
Spektrum:Spektr Spektr/um__n_nt ;
Vakuum:Vaku Spektr/um__n_nt ;
Volumen:Volum Volum/en__n_nt ;
Stadion:Stadi Stadi/on__n_nt ;
Fußballstadion:Fußballstadi Stadi/on__n_nt ;
Psychopharmakon:Psychopharmak Lexik/on__n_nt ;
Lexikon:Lexik Lexik/on__n_nt ;
Paradoxon:Paradox Lexik/on__n_nt ;
Konto:Kont Kont/o__n_nt ;
Skonto:Skont Kont/o__n_nt ;
Bankkonto:Bankkont Kont/o__n_nt ;
Girokonto:Girokont Kont/o__n_nt ;
Sparkonto:Sparkont Kont/o__n_nt ;
Gemeinschaftskonto:Gemeinschaftskont Kont/o__n_nt ;
Risiko:Ris Ris/iko__n_nt ;
Opus:Opus Op/us__n_nt ;
Korpus:Korpus Korp/us__n_nt ;
Virus:Virus Vir/us__n_nt ;
